Hawaii, session 2025, GM1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 291C-107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
3 "(a) The department of transportation or a county shall
4 consider the following factors when setting a maximum speed
5 limit pursuant to section 291C-102:
6 (1) An engineering study conducted for the road whose
7 maximum speed limit is being set[7—provided that the
8 engineering study], which shall include an analysis of
9 the current speed distribution of free-flowing
10 vehicles; provided [further] that [the requi-remento
11 ef^] this paragraph shall not apply when the department
12 of transportation or any county reduces a maximum
13 speed limit within [efte]^
14 (A) Or^ mile of a school; and
15 (B) Ten miles per hour of the current speed limit for
16 that road;
2025-3355 HB1259 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO.
g g
I. . 'I
C.D. 1
1 (2) For sections of highways with residential or
2 commercial areas or schools iminediately adjacent to
3 the roadway, the department of transportation or a
4 county shall, to the extent practicable, consider
5 guidance provided by the National Association of City
6 Transportation Officials; provided that nothing in
7 this paragraph shall be construed to supersede any
8 applicable federal standards or requirements; and
9 [454-] (3) Any other factors prescribed by the Federal
10 Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic
11 Control Devices, as amended."
12 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
13 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
14 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3355 HB1259 CDl HMSO 2

1259
H.B. NO.
X
b
oco
Ob
APPROVED this 6th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1259, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
—■
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1259, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
62